Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3816
Excise tax; amount; records; return; collection.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, an excise tax shall be levied on the retail sale of kratom products to consumers. The tax shall be at a rate of ten percent of the retail purchase price.

(2) The excise tax imposed by this section shall be in addition to all other occupation, privilege, sales, or use taxes imposed by this state or by any political subdivision of the state.

(3) Each retailer of kratom products shall maintain complete and accurate electronic records of sales of kratom products, in the manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue. Each such retailer shall provide such records to the department upon request.

(4)(a) Each retailer of kratom products shall file a return with the department by the twentieth day of the month following the month reported and with the report shall remit the amount of excise tax due.

(b) The return, which shall be upon forms prescribed and furnished by the department, shall contain, among other things, the total amount of kratom products sold or transferred during the preceding month and the amount of tax due thereon.

(c) The department may require retailers to file tax returns electronically and to remit payments due by electronic funds transfers.

(5) The department shall collect the excise tax and shall account for and remit to the State Treasurer at least once each month all money collected pursuant to such tax for credit to the General Fund.

Laws 2026, LB901, § 10.
July 18, 2026